Wisconsin, session 2025, SB348.
do enact as follows:SB348,13Section 1. 115.28 (63) (d) of the statutes is created to read:SB348,1,44115.28 (63) (d) Social and emotional learning.SB348,21Section 2. Fiscal changes.SB348,2,62(1) Mental health training program. In the schedule under s. 20.005 (3) 3for the appropriation to the department of public instruction under s. 20.255 (1) 4(ep), the dollar amount for fiscal year 2025-26 is increased by $500,000 and the 5dollar amount for fiscal year 2026-27 is increased by $500,000 for the purpose for 6which the appropriation is made.SB348,37Section 3. Effective date.SB348,2,98(1) This act takes effect on the day after publication, or on the 2nd day after 9publication of the 2025 biennial budget act, whichever is later.SB348,2,1010